Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CITY OF BLOOMINGTON.new text end new text begin $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the city of Bloomington for workforce development programming, including the Bloom in Bloomington youth summer internship program. This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. new text end